District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.87

Filing of articles of dissolution; effect of certificate of dissolution.

Repealed.

History

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 216, ch. 269, § 87
Sept. 2, 1957, 71 Stat. 571, Pub. L. 85-254, § 22
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-101.87.
1981 Ed., § 29-387.
1973 Ed., § 29-930k.